Missouri, session 2026, HB2895.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 115.306, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 115.306, to read as follows:
115.306. 1. No person shall qualify as a candidate for elective public office in the
state of Missouri who has been found guilty of or pled guilty to a felony under the federal
laws of the United States of America or to a felony under the laws of this state or an offense
committed in another state that would be considered a felony in this state.
2. (1) Any person who files as a candidate for election to a public office shall be
disqualified from participation in the election for which the candidate has filed if such person
is delinquent in the payment of any state income taxes, personal property taxes, municipal
taxes, real property taxes on the place of residence, as stated on the declaration of candidacy,
or if the person is a past or present corporate officer of any fee office that owes any taxes to
the state.
(2) Each potential candidate for election to a public office, except candidates for a
county or city committee of a political party, shall file an affidavit with the department of
revenue and include a copy of the affidavit with the declaration of candidacy required under
section 115.349. Such affidavit shall be in substantially the following form:
AFFIRMATION OF TAX PAYMENTS AND BONDING
REQUIREMENTS:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2895 2
I hereby declare under penalties of perjury that I am not currently
aware of any delinquency in the filing or payment of any state income
taxes, personal property taxes, municipal taxes, real property taxes on
the place of residence, as stated on the declaration of candidacy, or that
I am a past or present corporate officer of any fee office that owes any
taxes to the state, other than those taxes which may be in dispute. I
declare under penalties of perjury that I am not aware of any
information that would prohibit me from fulfilling any bonding
requirements for the office for which I am filing.
_______________ Candidate's Signature
_______________ Printed Name of Candidate
(3) Upon receipt of a complaint alleging a delinquency of the candidate in the filing
or payment of any state income taxes, personal property taxes, municipal taxes, real property
taxes on the place of residence, as stated on the declaration of candidacy, or if the person is a
past or present corporate officer of any fee office that owes any taxes to the state, the
department of revenue shall investigate such potential candidate to verify the claim contained
in the complaint. If the department of revenue finds a positive affirmation to be false, the
department shall contact the secretary of state, or the election official who accepted such
candidate's declaration of candidacy, and the potential candidate. The department shall notify
the candidate of the outstanding tax owed and give the candidate thirty days to remit any such
outstanding taxes owed which are not the subject of dispute between the department and the
candidate. If the candidate fails to remit such amounts in full within thirty days, the candidate
shall be disqualified from participating in the current election and barred from refiling for an
entire election cycle even if the individual pays all of the outstanding taxes that were the
subject of the complaint.
(4) Any person who files as a candidate for election to a public office that
performs county functions in a city not within a county shall file an affidavit with the
election authority and shall attach thereto official copies of receipts or no-tax-due
statements received from the collector and official statements from the collector that
indicate the person has paid all taxes due and is not delinquent in any tax. The election
authority shall review such documentation and the affirmation of tax payments
required under subdivision (2) of this subsection.
✔